Utah statutes.
17B-2a-908.   Limit on property tax authority -- Exceptions.
(1)  As used in this section, "elected board" means a service area board of
trustees, each of whose members:
(a)  is elected to the board of trustees by service area voters at an election
held for that purpose; or
(b)  holds, at the time of appointment to the board of trustees, an elected
position with:
(i)  a county, some or all of whose unincorporated area is included within the
boundary of the service area; or
(ii)  a municipality that is partially or completely included within the
boundary of the service area.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a service area that does not
have an elected board may not levy or collect a property tax during a tax year
beginning on or after January 1, 2010.
(b)  A service area that does not have an elected board may levy and collect a
property tax during a tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2010:
(i)  if and to the extent that revenue from the property tax was pledged
before May 12, 2009 to pay for bonds or other obligations of the service area;
or
(ii)  if the property tax levy has previously been approved by:
(A)  service area voters at an election held for that purpose; or
(B)  the legislative body of:
(I)  each municipality that is partially or completely included within the
boundary of the service area; and
(II)  the county in which the service area is located, if the county has some
or all of its unincorporated area included within the boundary of the service
area.
